src/morphology/guesser.lexc
! Guesser needs these
Letter = a|e|i|o|u|õ|ä|ö|ü|b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|š|z|ž|t|v|w|x|y; 
AnySymbol = Letter | CapLetter | Dig ;  ! punctuation symbols missing from here; is it OK?

! Define phones for phonological patterns
aA = a|A; bB = b|B; cC = c|C; dD = d|D; eE = e|E; fF = f|F; gG = g|G; hH = h|H; iI = i|I; jJ = j|J; 
kK = k|K; lL = l|L; mM = m|M; nN = n|N; oO = o|O; pP = p|P; qQ = q|Q; rR = r|R; sS = s|S; šŠ = š|Š; 
zZ = z|Z; žŽ = ž|Ž; tT = t|T; uU = u|U; vV = v|V; wW = w|W; õÕ = õ|Õ; äÄ = ä|Ä; öÖ = ö|Ö; üÜ = ü|Ü; 
xX = x|X; yY = y|Y ;
! double vowels and diphtongs:
!
!   ii    iu         üü üi                                    ui    uu
!   ei ee eu eo ea   öö öi öe    öa       õõ õi õe õu õo      oi oe ou oo oa
!                    ää äi äe äu                              ai ae au ao aa
!
VowNoDots = iI|uU|aA|eE|oO;
VowDots = [ õÕ|äÄ|öÖ|üÜ ];
Vowel = [ VowNoDots | VowDots ] | yY | wW ;
DoubleVow = [aA aA] | [eE eE] | [iI iI] | [oO oO] | [uU uU] | [õÕ õÕ] | [äÄ äÄ] | [öÖ öÖ] | [üÜ üÜ];
Diphtong = [Vowel VowNoDots] & ~[HighVowel NonHighVowel] & ~DoubleVow & ~[äÄ aA] & ~[öÖ oO] & ~[üÜ uU];  ! y and w in diphtongs is weird... 

JVow = [iI [VowNoDots - iI]];   ! ia, ie, iu, io; iu=ju; io=jo , v.a. viimases jalas lühikese rõhulise silbi järel (minia, venia)
EVow = [[eE [VowNoDots - iI]] & ~[eE eE]];   ! eu=e_u; eo=e_o; ea=e_a lühikese? rõhulise silbi järel, s.t. kahe OrdFoot vahel või ... vahel...
UVow = [[uU [VowNoDots - iI]] & ~[uU uU]];   ! uo, ua, ue - esimeses silbis diftong, mujal kaks eraldi vokaali

StrictDiphtong = [Diphtong & ~[JVow] & ~[UVow] & ~[EVow]] ; ! ei saa olla muud kui diftong, s.t. tema keskel ei saa olla silbipiiri 
LongV =  [DoubleVow | Diphtong] ;

Ckpt = kK|pP|tT;
DoubleCkpt = [kK kK] | [pP pP] | [tT tT] ;
Clmnr = lL|mM|nN|rR;
DoubleClmnr = [lL lL] | [mM mM] | [nN nN] | [rR rR] ;
Cgbd = gG|bB|dD;
Cfš = fF|šŠ;
Csibilant = [s|š|z|ž];
Cnonsonor = [Ckpt | Cgbd | Cfš | hH | sS ] ;
Consonant = Cnonsonor | Clmnr | jJ | vV | cC|qQ|zZ|žŽ|wW|xX|yY;
ShortCons = [Cgbd | Clmnr | hH | jJ | sS | vV] ;

DoubleCons = DoubleCkpt | DoubleClmnr | [fF fF] | [hH hH] | [sS sS] | [šŠ šŠ] | [vV vV]  ;

! kind of syllable pair
! uba, puänt, laua, liaan
Pair = [[Vowel+ Consonant+ Vowel+] | 
       [[Vowel Vowel] & ~LongV] |                
       [[LongV Vowel] & ~[Vowel DoubleVow]] |    
       [[Vowel DoubleVow] & ~[LongV Vowel]]];     

! Syllables
ShortVSyll = Vowel ;
ShortCSyll = [[Vowel | JVow | UVow] [Consonant | [Cgbd Clmnr]]] ;
LongCSyll =  [[Vowel | JVow | UVow] [[Consonant Consonant+] & ~[Cgbd Clmnr]]] ;
LCSyll =     [LongCSyll & ~[?* [DoubleCons | [Clmnr sS sS]]]] ;

! word syllable count starts from the last stressed syllable:
! it may be the first syllable of the word, or the last one with long vowel
FirstSyll = [Consonant* [ShortCSyll | ShortVSyll]] | [?* LongCSyll] | 
            [[[?* DoubleVow] | [[?* Diphtong] & ~[?* [DoubleVow | StrictDiphtong] Vowel]]] Consonant*] ;

! foot is a recurring building block for patterns
badinfoot = [\Vowel* [LongV | JVow | UVow] \Vowel*] | [?* DoubleVow \Vowel*];
Foot = [FirstSyll [ShortVSyll | ShortCSyll | LCSyll]] & ~[badinfoot] ;

! three syllable sequence
ThreeSyllV = [Foot Vowel] & ~[?* [DoubleVow | StrictDiphtong]] ;

! lauatu, mitte ideetu, aga ka nimetatu (võiks olla paradigm deriv);  ideetu, aga ka tuutu
DerTu = [[?* Pair tT uU] |   
         [?* LongV tT uU] ];                         
DerJa = [[?* Vowel Consonant+ Vowel jJ aA] | [?* Vowel Consonant+ tT jJ aA]];
DerNe = [[?* Pair (Consonant) nN eE] | [?* Vowel [Vowel | Consonant] Consonant+ nN eE]];
DerKe = [?* Pair kK eE] ;

! patterns for productive inflectional types
! prefix Proto denotes ordinary words, Nimi denotes names

! video, rodeo, stereo also like ARMEE
ProtoARMEE = [FirstSyll & [?* Vowel]] | [Consonant* [JVow | UVow]];

NimiARMEE = [?* [Vowel]] ;

ProtoKAVA = [[Consonant* Vowel ShortCons [VowNoDots - eE]] |
                  [Foot [tT | [sS tT] | [sS kK]] eE lL uU]] ;
!nimiKAVA is unnecessary

SyllAASTA = [[ThreeSyllV & [?* VowNoDots]] & ~DerKe] ;

! viimane on ka ThreeSyll, aga EndAASTA on mugav ; tegelinski
EndAASTA = [[?* Vowel Consonant+ iI aA] |   
           [?* Vowel Consonant+ iI kK aA] | 
           [?* Vowel Consonant+ sS kK iI]] ;                                       

            
! tüüne, haige, rohke, raske, range,  lükra , kalme, võimla, Brodski, mitte katte ega veski
! need ei tohiks olla AASTA tüüpi
BadGradeAASTA = [Consonant* Vowel [Consonant | [Cgbd Clmnr]] VowNoDots] | 
                     [Consonant* Vowel Consonant Csibilant [VowNoDots - eE]] | 
                     [?* Vowel DoubleClmnr  [VowNoDots - eE]] ;

GradeAASTA = [Foot & [?* Vowel+ Consonant+ VowNoDots] & ~BadGradeAASTA] ;

AASTA = [SyllAASTA | EndAASTA | GradeAASTA] ;  ! DerJa tuleks verbi tuletisena nagunii, eks?

ProtoAASTA = [AASTA & ~DerNe] | DerTu | DerJa ;

! kui iganes mahub piisavalt silpe, siis ongi AASTA tüüp...
NimiAASTA = [?* AASTA] ;

! need justkui ei tohiks olla PERE tüüpi (on ainult AASTA tüüpi)
BadGradePere = [[?* LongV Consonant Consonant Consonant+ Vowel] |
                     [?* Csibilant Consonant Consonant+ Vowel] |
                     [?* Consonant+ Cgbd Clmnr Vowel] 
                    ] ;

GradePERE = [Foot & [[?* Vowel+ Consonant+ Vowel] & ~BadGradePere ]] ;

SyllPERE = [[?* Vowel] & ~ProtoARMEE & ~AASTA] | [Consonant* JVow];

VoorPERE = [?* ? Consonant Vowel Vowel [kK|nN] eE] ; ! karaoke, lantsaroone

ProtoPERE = [[SyllPERE | [SyllAASTA & ~EndAASTA]] & ~DerJa  & ~DerTu & ~DerKe & ~DerNe] | [GradePERE & ~DerNe] | VoorPERE ;
! eefeu, panatsea jms kuuluvad ka PERE alla, ehkki tegelt samad vormid saaks ARMEE + AASTA kaudu...

! almost anything is possible... e.g. Sydney, Maria, Tanganjika
NimiPERE =  [?* ? Vowel] & ~[FirstSyll & [?* Vowel]];

ProtoPEENIKE = DerKe ;
!NimiPEENIKE is unnecessary ?

DerLine = [lL iI nN eE] ;
DerLane = [lL aA nN eE] ;
DerMine = [mM iI nN eE];
DerLiLaMiNe = DerLine | DerLane | DerMine;

AnyOLULINE = [?* Vowel Consonant+ [aA|eE|iI|uU] nN eE] | [[Foot & [?* Vowel]] nN eE] ;  ! ka laiune
AnyOLULIS =  [?* Vowel Consonant+ VowNoDots sS] | [[Foot & [?* [iI|uU]]] sS] | [[Foot & [?* [Vowel - uU]]] uU sS] | [[?* Pair Vowel sS] & [?* [JVow | EVow | UVow] sS]];  ! ka laius, avaus; 

! these patterns can never occur for OLULINE
SyllSOOLANE = [Consonant* [ShortCSyll & [Vowel Consonant+]] VowNoDots nN eE] ;                 ! tinane, rublane, mitte kiuline
SyllSOOLAS =  [Consonant* [ShortCSyll & [Vowel Consonant+]] VowNoDots sS] | [Consonant* Vowel+ Consonant+ iI sS];                 ! jänes, Valdis 

EndSOOLANE = [?* Vowel [Vowel | Consonant+] nN eE] & ~[Consonant* Vowel [Consonant - [Ckpt | mM]] nN eE] ;  ! jäine, ...aarne, ...stne, ka akne ja tamne; laiune

! ProtoOLULIS: selle mustriga sõnad võivad olla pl par lõpus -si;
ProtoOLULIS = [AnyOLULIS & ~SyllSOOLAS] ;

NimiOLULIS = [ProtoOLULIS] ;

ProtoOLULINE = [ AnyOLULINE & ~[SyllSOOLANE | EndSOOLANE]] ;  ! ei tunne laiune, sest selle tunneb (valesti) EndSOOLANE

NimiOLULINE = [ProtoOLULINE] ;

! soolane: kõik ne, s lõpulised on siin 
ProtoSOOLAS = [?* Pair sS] & ~[?* [DoubleVow | StrictDiphtong] sS] ; ! ei tunne: päis, teos jts 1-silbilised

NimiSOOLAS = [ProtoSOOLAS] ;

ProtoSOOLANE = [?* ? ? ? nN eE] ; ! ei tunne: upne, öine; 

NimiSOOLANE = [ProtoSOOLANE] ;

SyllMUUSEUM = [?* Vowel [Vowel | Consonant+] Consonant [JVow | EVow] Clmnr] |
                   [?* Vowel Cfš [JVow | EVow] Clmnr];        ! kahtlane: liineal (aga ok: ookean)
ProtoMUUSEUM = SyllMUUSEUM ;

NimiMUUSEUM = [ProtoMUUSEUM] ;

SyllELANIK = [Foot Consonant iI kK] ;   

! võiks ka nii:
! need ei tohiks olla ELANIK tüüpi
! valesti: kümnik; ...eerik, ... aga ka (valesti) nt suumik, soo+lik
BadGradeELANIK = [Consonant* Vowel [Consonant | [Cgbd Clmnr]] iI kK] | 
                      [Consonant* Vowel Consonant Csibilant iI kK] | 
                      [(?* Consonant) Consonant* Vowel DoubleClmnr iI kK] |
                      [Consonant* Vowel ShortCons [ShortCons - [lL|mM]] iI kK] |   
                      [?* DoubleVow Consonant iI kK] |                            
                      [?* Diphtong [Consonant - Clmnr] iI kK];           

! kaks silpi, kolmas välde
GradeELANIK = [Foot & [?* Vowel+ Consonant+ iI kK] & ~BadGradeELANIK] ;

EndELANIK =    [?* Pair Consonant* lL iI kK] | [?* LongV lL iI kK ] ;  ! ...tuslik, ealik, hoolik, dulcinealik...

!ei tunne: kümnik, suumik
ProtoELANIK = [SyllELANIK | GradeELANIK | EndELANIK];

NimiELANIK = [ProtoELANIK] ;

SyllVIRSIK = [Foot] & [?* [[aA | eE | iI] [kK | [nN gG] | [rR gG]]]] ;

EndVIRSIK = [?* Consonant^2 iI kK] | [?* Vowel tT iI kK] ;

BadVirsik = [?* Vowel Consonant+ Vowel (sS) lL iI kK] | [?* bB eE rR gG];
ProtoVIRSIK = [SyllVIRSIK | EndVIRSIK] & ~BadVirsik; ! ei tunne: kürenaik, paranoik, stoik

NimiVIRSIK = [ProtoVIRSIK] | [?* Vowel Consonant+ iI cC (kK) ] ; ! ka Titanic, Eric

! ka seviot ja patriot

SyllKABINET = [ThreeSyllV Ckpt] & [[?* Consonant Vowel Ckpt] | [?* [[Vowel Vowel] & ~LongV] Ckpt] ];
BadEndKABINET = [?* iI kK];

! puuslak, kotlet, s.t. 2-silbilised
ThirdGradeKABINET = [[[Consonant* [LongV | [Vowel+ Consonant* Ckpt]] Consonant* Vowel Ckpt]] & [?* Consonant Consonant Vowel Ckpt]];

ProtoKABINET = [[SyllKABINET | ThirdGradeKABINET] & ~BadEndKABINET] | [Consonant* Vowel Ckpt];
! mitte_kabinet hulka kuulub palju valesid, aga kabinet alla ei kuulu nt tuk-tuk...

NimiKABINET = [ProtoKABINET] ;

SyllMAGUS = [Consonant* Vowel ShortCons iI nN] | [Consonant* Vowel ([Vowel | Consonant]) Consonant iI tT sS];  ! sabin, koorits nagu KAVA ja PERE...
ProtoMAGUS = [SyllMAGUS] ;

NimiMAGUS = ProtoMAGUS ;

ProtoLOHAKAS = [[?* ? Vowel kK aA sS] | [?* ? ? jJ aA sS]] & ~[Consonant* Vowel [jJ|kK] aA sS];

! polegi vaja 
!NimiLOHAKAS = [ProtoLOHAKAS] ;

SyllREDEL = [?* Consonant] & [[?* Foot] | [Consonant* JVow Consonant+]] & ~BadEndKABINET & ~[?* Consonant Vowel sS] & ~ProtoMUUSEUM ;

EndREDEL =  [?* Vowel Consonant Consonant+ eE [lL|rR]] | [?* Vowel Consonant* Cnonsonor [lL|rR]];  ! minister, Dnestr, Panagl
AlsoREDEL = [Consonant* Vowel+ [[[Consonant - lL] lL] | [[Consonant - rR] rR]]] |
                 [Consonant* Vowel Vowel [nN|rR] dD]; !  kreml, loend

ProtoREDEL = [SyllREDEL | EndREDEL | AlsoREDEL] ;

NimiREDEL = [ProtoREDEL] | [?* Vowel [Vowel | Clmnr] sS kK];  ! ka Tomsk, Baltiisk; ei tunne Stuart ega Sinead

SyllTAUD = [?* Consonant] & ~[?* Vowel Consonant+ Vowel sS] & ~[?* Vowel Consonant+ JVow sS] & ~[?* Consonant Vowel Ckpt] &
                ~[?* LongV Consonant+ Vowel ShortCons]  & ~ProtoMUUSEUM & ~[?* kK oO nN dD];
AlsoTAUD = [Consonant* Vowel+ Consonant Vowel [[lL lL] | [sS sS]] Vowel Clmnr] ;  ! emissar, patisson, leveller

ProtoTAUD = [SyllTAUD | AlsoTAUD] ;

NimiTAUD = [ProtoTAUD] | [?* Vowel gG rR aA dD] ;  ! ka Beograd

!----
ProtoKOND = [?* ? ? k o n ] ; ! d:"D1"  kond-derivation hack

Word = [Letter+] ;
Name = [CapLetter Letter+] ;


! This guesser lexicon turned into a transcuder is later union-ed with the transducer of simplex words.
! They are tied to each other via flag diacritics.
! The Kleene star operation on top of the resulting transducer will yield the complete vocabulary, incl. compound words.
 

LEXICON Root !!= * {{@CODE@}} is the starting point of everything

@D.Part@@P.Part.Bad@@P.POS.NProp@@U.Cap.Obl@   GuessName ;          !!= * {{@CODE@}}
!@D.Part@@P.Part.Bad@@P.POS.NProp@@U.Cap.Opt@   GuessName ;          !!= * {{@CODE@}}
!@D.Part@@P.Part.Bad@   GuessDerivation "weight: 35" ;          !!= * {{@CODE@}}
@D.Part@@P.Part.Bad@@P.POS.N@   GuessSimplexNoun ;          !!= * {{@CODE@}}

! blahblah that might be followed by a word; a desperate attempt at guessing:
! 
@D.Part@@P.Part.Two@@P.NeedPartThree.On@@P.POS.Guess@@P.Stem.Guessed@ SomeThing ;        

   
LEXICON SomeThing

  < [~Name & ~Word & [AnySymbol* AnySymbol AnySymbol]] 0:%- "+Guess":0 > # ;
  < [Name & [?* ? ?]] 0:%- "+Guess":0 "+N":0 "+Prop":0 > # ;
  < [Word & [?* ? ?]] 0:» "+Guess":0 > # ;     ! » blocks insertion of a surface hyphen (elsewhere)
